Washington statutes.
RCW 19.134.050

Information statement—Contents.

The information statement required under RCW 19.134.040 shall include all of the following:

(1)(a) A conspicuous statement in boldface 10-point type at the top of the statement that clearly outlines to a consumer how the credit services organization will act on behalf of the consumer, including that with explicit approval, the credit services organization may use the consumer's signature;

(b) A complete and accurate statement of the consumer's right to review any file on the consumer maintained by any consumer reporting agency, as provided under the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. Secs. 1681 through 1681t;

(c) A statement that the consumer may review his or her consumer reporting agency file at no charge if a request is made to the consumer reporting agency within 30 days after receiving notice that credit has been denied;

(d) The approximate price the consumer will be charged by the consumer reporting agency to review his or her consumer reporting agency file; and

(e) The following notice:

"If you have a complaint about the services provided by this credit services organization or the fees charged by this credit services organization, you may submit that complaint to the Washington state Attorney General's Office electronically at https://www.atg.wa.gov/file-complaint or by mail to Attn: ......, 800 5th Avenue, Suite 2000, Seattle, WA 98104-3188."

The information statement shall be printed in at least 10-point boldface type and shall include the following statement:

"CONSUMER CREDIT FILE RIGHTS UNDER STATE AND FEDERAL LAW

You have a right to obtain a free copy of your credit report from a consumer reporting agency. You may obtain this free copy of your credit report one time per year by visiting www.AnnualCreditReport.com. You will be able to view your credit report, dispute alleged inaccuracies, and obtain additional information at no fee. If requested, the consumer reporting agency must provide someone to help you interpret the information in your credit file.

You have a right to dispute inaccurate information by contacting the consumer reporting agency directly. However, neither you nor any credit repair company or credit services organization has the right to have accurate, current, and verifiable information removed from your credit report. Under the Federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, the consumer reporting agency must remove accurate, negative information from your report only if it is over seven years old. Bankruptcy information can be reported for 10 years.

If you have notified a consumer reporting agency in writing that you dispute the accuracy of information in your credit file, the consumer reporting agency must then reinvestigate and modify or remove inaccurate information. The consumer reporting agency may not charge a fee for this service. Any pertinent information and copies of all documents you have concerning an error should be given to the consumer reporting agency.

If the reinvestigation does not resolve the dispute to your satisfaction, you may send a brief statement to the consumer reporting agency to keep in your file, explaining why you think the record is inaccurate. The consumer reporting agency must include your statement about disputed information in any report it issues about you.

You have a right to cancel the contract with the credit services organization for any reason before midnight on the fifth working day after you signed it. If for any reason you cancel the contract during this time, you do not owe any money.

You have a right to take legal action against a credit services organization if it misleads you.";

(2) A complete and accurate statement of the consumer's right to dispute the completeness or accuracy of any item contained in any file on the consumer maintained by any consumer reporting agency;

(3) A complete and detailed description of the services to be performed by the credit services organization for the consumer and the total amount the consumer will have to pay, or become obligated to pay, for the services;

(4) A statement asserting the consumer's right to proceed against the bond or trust account required under RCW 19.134.020; and

(5) The name and address of the surety company that issued the bond, or the name and address of the depository and the trustee and the account number of the trust account.

[ 2023 c 144 s 6; 1986 c 218 s 6.]